Illinois, session 104th, HB842.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Local Solid Waste Disposal Act is amended 5by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (415 ILCS 10/1)  (from Ch. 85, par. 5901)7    Sec. 1. This Act shall be known and and may be cited as the 8"Local Solid Waste Disposal Act".9(Source: P.A. 84-963.)